Tennessee statutes. Title 28 Limitation Of Actions
Chapter 1

General Provisions

28-1-101. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 2761; Shan., § 4452; Code 1932, § 8578; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-101; repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 37, effective July 1, 2020.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 28-8-101 defined “action.”

28-1-102. Commencement at time of right to make demand.

When a right exists, but a demand is necessary to entitle the party to an action, the limitation commences from the time the plaintiff's right to make the demand was completed, and not from the date of the demand.

Code 1858, § 2780; Shan., § 4477; Code 1932, § 8604; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-102.

Cross-References. Commencement of criminal prosecution, § 40-2-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 38; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bailments, § 17; 15 Tenn. Juris., Insurance, § 83; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 24.

28-1-103. Accrual of agent's liability to principal.

When an injury arises from the act or omission of a deputy or agent, the time for the limitation of an action by the principal against such deputy or agent does not commence to run until the liability of the principal for the act or omission is ascertained by suit of the aggrieved party against such principal, or otherwise.

Code 1858, § 2781; Shan., § 4478; Code 1932, § 8605; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, § 38; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitation of Actions, § 8.

28-1-104. Accrual of principal's liability to surety or endorser.

The time for the limitation of an action by either a surety or accommodation endorser against their principal on negotiable paper, or for any matter growing out of the suretyship, does not commence to run until judgment is rendered against the surety or endorser, or the surety or endorser until the surety or endorser has paid the money.

Code 1858, § 2782; Shan., § 4479; Code 1932, § 8606; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-104.

28-1-105. New action after adverse decision — Contractual limitations periods.

If the action is commenced within the time limited by a rule or statute of limitation, but the judgment or decree is rendered against the plaintiff upon any ground not concluding the plaintiff's right of action, or where the judgment or decree is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, and is arrested, or reversed on appeal, the plaintiff, or the plaintiff's representatives and privies, as the case may be, may, from time to time, commence a new action within one (1) year after the reversal or arrest. Actions originally commenced in general sessions court and subsequently recommenced pursuant to this section in circuit or chancery court shall not be subject to the monetary jurisdictional limit originally imposed in the general sessions court.

In the case of a contract which limits the time within which an action arising out of such contract must be brought, if such action is commenced within the time as limited by the contract but the judgment or decree is rendered against the plaintiff upon any ground not concluding the plaintiff's right of action, or where the judgment or decree is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, and is arrested, or reversed on appeal, the plaintiff, or the plaintiff's representatives or successors, as the case may be, may, from time to time, commence a new action within one (1) year after the nonsuit, dismissal without prejudice, reversal or arrest.

Code 1858, § 2755 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 6; 1819, ch. 28, § 3); Shan., § 4446; mod. Code 1932, § 8572; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-106; Acts 1985, ch. 344, § 1; 1989, ch. 225, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 225, § 2 provided that subsection (b) applies to all nonsuits, dismissals without prejudice, reversals or arrests entered on or after May 2, 1989.

Cross-References. Monetary jurisdiction of general sessions court, § 16-15-501.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 780.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-13.01, 1-41.01-4.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 66; 11 Tenn. Juris., 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 40, 44; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 10; 26 Tenn. Juris., Workers' Compensation, § 13.

Law Reviews.

10 Significant Differences Between State and Federal Civil Procedure, 38 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 27 (2002).

Adaptation of Program of Procedural Reform to Tennessee Practice (Walter P. Armstrong), 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 614.

Champerty as We Know It (R.D. Cox), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (1983).

Civil Procedure — Appeal and Nonsuit — Inconclusive Dismissal, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 511.

Conflict of Laws — 1956 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 940.

Counterclaims, Amendments, Relation-back and the Statute of Limitations, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 441.

Labor Law and Workmen's Compensation — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Paul H. Sanders and J. Gilmer Bowman, Jr.), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1231.

Limitation of Actions — Broadening Scope of Tennessee Saving Statute, 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 326.

Nonsuits Don't Necessarily Save You (Donald F. Paine), 25 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 28 (1989).

Nonsuits IV: An Updated List of Don'ts (Donald F. Paine), 39 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (2003).

Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1108.

Real Property — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1124.

Savings Statutes v. Statutes of Repose: A Decision Is Reached with Cronin v. Howe (Philip E. Mischke), 32 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 21 (1996).

Sex, Lies and Nonsuits (Donald F. Paine), 29 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1993).

Statute of Limitations — Tolling of Statute by Suit in Court without Jurisdiction, 9 Tenn. L. Rev. 200.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IV. Pretrial Procedure (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 308.

Tennessee Annexation Law: History, Analysis, and Proposed Amendments (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (1989).

The Category of Tough: Nonsuits III (Donald F. Paine), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 16 (1998).

The Tennessee Saving Statute, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 287.

Title by Adverse Possession in Tennessee, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 621.

Torts — 1956 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 1137.

Voluntary Dismissals and Nonsuits in Tennessee (Clinton H. McKay), 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 787.

Workers' Compensation Outline (Paul Campbell III), 18 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1982).

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T. A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 447.

28-1-106. Accrual of right if person under eighteen years of age, adjudicated incompetent, or lacking capacity.

If the person entitled to commence an action is, at the time the cause of action accrued, either under eighteen (18) years of age, or adjudicated incompetent, such person, or such person's representatives and privies, as the case may be, may commence the action, after legal rights are restored, within the time of limitation for the particular cause of action, unless it exceeds three (3) years, and in that case within three (3) years from restoration of legal rights.

Persons over the age of eighteen (18) years of age are presumed competent.

If the person entitled to commence an action, at the time the cause of action accrued, lacks capacity, such person or such person's representatives and privies, as the case may be, may commence the action, after removal of such incapacity, within the time of limitation for the particular cause of action, unless it exceeds three (3) years, and in that case within three (3) years from removal of such incapacity, except as provided for in subdivision (c)(2).

Any individual with court-ordered fiduciary responsibility towards a person who lacks capacity, or any individual who possesses the legal right to bring suit on behalf of a person who lacks capacity, shall commence the action on behalf of that person within the applicable statute of limitations and may not rely on any tolling of the statute of limitations, unless that individual can establish by clear and convincing evidence that the individual did not and could not reasonably have known of the accrued cause of action.

Any person asserting lack of capacity and the lack of a fiduciary or other representative who knew or reasonably should have known of the accrued cause of action shall have the burden of proving the existence of such facts.

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall affect or toll any statute of repose within this code.

For purposes of this section, the term “person who lacks capacity” means and shall be interpreted consistently with the term “person of unsound mind” as found in this section prior to its amendment by Chapter 47 of the Public Acts of 2011.

Code 1858, § 2757 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 9; 1819, ch. 28, §§ 1, 2; 1823, ch. 16, § 1; 1827, ch. 75); Acts 1901, ch. 15, § 1; Shan., § 4448; mod. Code 1932, § 8574; Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-107; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 17; 2016, ch. 932, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 2016, ch. 932, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply only to causes of action filed on or after April 27, 2016.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 325, 352.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, §§ 2, 25, 39, 56, 63; 5 Tenn. Juris., Beneficial and Benevolent Associations, §§ 26, 30, 32; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 32; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 4, 20, 25; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, etc., §§ 8, 14; 19 Tenn. Juris., Negligence, § 14; 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 8; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 60.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Day on Torts: Can a Minor Sue for Pre-majority Medical Expenses? (John A. Day), 43 Tenn B.J. 29 (2007).

Domestic Relations — 1963 Tennessee Survey (T. A. Smedley), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1039.

Negligence — Subsequent Emancipation — Effect on Family Immunity, 29 Tenn. L. Rev. 595.

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

Amending Tennessee's Incapacity Statute: It “May Not Be a Sexy Story, But It's One, Frankly, That … Will Help People”, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 575 (Winter 2018).

28-1-107. Cases in which disability not an excuse.

Section 28-1-106 shall not apply to actions on a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, or to actions against the estate of a deceased person brought more than seven (7) years from the death of the deceased, and the time the cause of action accrued, nor to cases provided for in § 28-2-105.

Code 1858, § 2758; Shan., § 4449; Code 1932, § 8575; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-108.

Cross-References. Action against decedent's estate, § 28-3-102.

28-1-108. Disability at time of accrual — Two or more disabilities.

No person can claim use of a disability unless it existed when the right of action accrued; but when two (2) or more disabilities exist at the time of accrual, the limitation does not attach until all are removed.

Code 1858, § 2759 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 28, § 1); Shan., 4450; Code 1932, § 8576; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 34.

28-1-109. Suspension during injunction.

When the commencement of an action is stayed by injunction, the time of the continuance of the injunction is not to be counted.

Code 1858, § 2756; Shan., § 4447; Code 1932, § 8573; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 38.

28-1-110. Suspension pending administration of estate.

The time between the death of a person and the grant of letters testamentary or of administration on such person's estate, not exceeding six (6) months, and the six (6) months within which a personal representative is exempt from suit, is not to be taken as a part of the time limited for commencing actions which lie against the personal representative.

Code 1858, § 2760; Shan., § 4451; Code 1932, § 8577; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-111.

Cross-References. Time limitation in actions against representatives, § 30-2-501.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 707.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 99.

Law Reviews.

Note, Laches at Law in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 211 (1997).

28-1-111. Suspension during absence from state.

If at any time any cause of action shall accrue against any person who shall be out of this state, the action may be commenced within the time limited therefor, after such person shall have come into the state; and, after any cause of action shall have accrued, if the person against whom it has accrued shall be absent from or reside out of the state, the time of absence or residence out of the state shall not be taken as any part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.

Acts 1865, ch. 10, § 3; Shan., § 4455; Code 1932, § 8581; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 35; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 101; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 100; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Carr v. Borchers: Tennessee's Nonresident Motorist Statute Revisited, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 357 (1992).

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Action for Personal Injury Resulting from Faulty Construction of Building Does Not Accrue Until Date of Injury, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Uniform Statute of Limitation on Foreign Claims Act: Tolling Problems (David H. Vernon), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 971.

28-1-112. Application of foreign statutes.

Where the statute of limitations of another state or government has created a bar to an action upon a cause accruing therein, while the party to be charged was a resident in such state or such government, the bar is equally effectual in this state.

Code 1858, § 2783; Shan., § 4480; Code 1932, § 8607; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 6 Tenn. Juris., Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 35.

Law Reviews.

A Review of Tennessee Conflicts of Law: Statute of Limitation, Statute of Frauds, Forum Non Conveniems, Torts (Robert L. Denkelspiel), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 37.

Business Associations — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Kenneth L. Roberts), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1141.

Choice-of-Law Statutes (Robert A. Leflar), 44 Tenn. L. Rev. 951.

Civil Procedure — Maestas v. Sofamor Danek Group, Inc.: The Tennessee Supreme Court's Rejection of the Doctrine of Cross-Jurisdictional Tolling, 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 521 (2002).

Conflict of Laws — Limitation of Actions — Lex Loci or Lex Fori, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1038.

Conflict of Laws — 1957 Tennessee Survey (John H. Wade), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 995.

Statute of Limitations and Radiation Injury, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 278.

Uniform Statute of Limitation on Foreign Claims Act: Tolling Problems (David H. Vernon), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 971.

28-1-113. Actions by state.

This title does not apply to actions brought by the state of Tennessee, unless otherwise expressly provided.

Code 1858, § 2762 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 113, § 3); impl. am. Acts 1865, ch. 36, § 34; impl. am. Acts 1873, ch. 13; Shan., § 4453; Code 1932, § 8579; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 28-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 98; 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 7, 8.

28-1-114. Counterclaim or third party complaint.

A counterclaim or third party complaint or cross-claim is not barred by the applicable statute of limitations or any statutory limitation of time, however characterized, if it was not barred at the time the claims asserted in the complaint were interposed.

If a nonsuit is taken as to the original civil action, any counterclaim, cross-claim or third party complaint arising from such action shall not be terminated but may proceed as an original civil action. However, if a counterclaim, cross-claim or third party complaint is filed as a civil action as permitted by this subsection (b) and such action does not proceed to an adjudication on the merits of such claim, the defendant shall have the right to file a counterclaim, cross-claim or third party complaint within the time allowed for the filing of a responsive pleading only if the original action is reinstituted pursuant to § 28-1-105.

Any counterclaim, cross-claim, or third party complaint arising from an action or suit originally commenced in general sessions court and subsequently recommenced as an original action or as a counterclaim, cross-claim or third party complaint pursuant to this section in circuit or chancery court according to the provisions of § 28-1-105, shall not be subject to the monetary jurisdictional limit originally imposed in general sessions court.

Acts 1978, ch. 758, § 1; T.C.A., § 28-116; Acts 1983, ch. 365, § 1; 1984, ch. 520, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 344, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 964, § 1 provided that the 1984 amendment not apply to any nonsuit or notice of dismissal filed prior to April 13, 1984, and that the law in effect on the date of the nonsuit or notice of dismissal was filed shall govern any such suit. The legislative intent was that the 1984 amendment not be applied retroactively to any nonsuit or notice of dismissal filed prior to April 13, 1984, and that notwithstanding the 1984 amendment or Tenn. R. Civ. P. 41.01 or any construction to the contrary, nonsuit taken prior to April 13, 1984, shall also terminate any counterclaim filed in a civil suit.

Cross-References. Limitation of actions, contracts for sale, § 47-2-725.

Limitation of actions, personal tort actions, § 28-3-104.

Limitation of actions, Uniform Contribution Among Tort-Feasors Act, § 29-11-104.

Monetary jurisdiction of general sessions court, § 16-15-501.

Statute of limitations in contracts for sale, § 47-2-725.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-13.01.

Law Reviews.

Counterclaims, Amendments, Relation-back and the Statute of Limitations, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 441.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IV. Pretrial Procedure (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 308.

The Nonparty Tortfeasor (June F. Entman), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (1992).

28-1-115. Dismissed federal court actions.

Notwithstanding any applicable statute of limitation to the contrary, any party filing an action in a federal court that is subsequently dismissed for lack of jurisdiction shall have one (1) year from the date of such dismissal to timely file such action in an appropriate state court.

Acts 1984, ch. 520, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 964, § 1 provided that this section does not apply to any nonsuit or notice of dismissal filed prior to April 13, 1984, and the law in effect on the date of nonsuit or notice of dismissal was filed shall govern any such suit. It is the legislative intent that this section not be applied retroactively to any nonsuit or notice of dismissal filed prior to April 13, 1984, and that notwithstanding this section or Tenn. R. Civ. P. 41.01, or any construction to the contrary, nonsuit taken prior to April 13, 1984 shall also terminate any counterclaim filed in a civil suit.

Law Reviews.

Nonsuits IV: An Updated List of Don'ts (Donald F. Paine), 39 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 15 (2003).

Sex, Lies and Nonsuits (Donald F. Paine), 29 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1993).

28-1-116. Extension during disaster.

In the event that a duly authorized member of the appellate judiciary enters an order declaring a disaster pursuant to the Tennessee supreme court rules, or the Tennessee rules of civil or appellate procedure, all applicable statutes of limitation and statutes of repose shall be extended in the counties subject to the order by the same number of days by which other applicable filing deadlines are extended. In the event an action could be properly filed in more than one (1) county, the deadline for that action shall be extended only in the county or counties in which a disaster is declared by the order.

Acts 2008, ch. 725, § 1.